en: Filled extruded crispbreads
fr: Tartines craquantes fourrées

en: Extruded and grilled biscuits with chocolate filling
fr: Tartines craquantes grillées fourrées au chocolat, Tartines craquantes extrudées et grillées fourrées au chocolat

en: Extruded and grilled biscuits with fruits filling
fr: Tartines craquantes grillées fourrées aux fruits, Tartines craquantes extrudées et grillées fourrées aux fruits

en: Gluten-free crispbreads
da: Glutenfrie knækbrød
sv: Glutenfria knäckebröd

en: Gluten-free breads, Gluten free bread
bg: Хляб без глутен
da: Glutenfri brød, Brød uden gluten
de: Glutenfreies Brot
es: Panes sin gluten
fi: gluteenittomat leivät
fr: Pains sans gluten, Pain sans gluten
hr: Kruhovi bez glutena
it: Pani senza glutine
lt: Duonos be glitimo, Duona be glitimo
nl: Glutenvrije broden, Glutenvrij brood, Broden zonder gluten
pl: Pieczywo bezglutenowe
pt: Pães sem glúten
ro: Pâini fără gluten, Pâine fără gluten
sv: Glutenfria bröd

en: Gluten-free bread rolls
da: Glutenfri rundstykker
de: Glutenfreies Brötchen
fr: Petits pains sans gluten
hr: Buns bez glutena
it: Panini inglesi senza glutine
lt: Bandelės be glitimo
nl: Glutenvrije broodjes
sv: Glutenfria bullar

en: Gluten-free breadsticks, Gluten-free grissini
bg: Гризини без глутен
da: Glutenfri grissini
de: Glutenfreies Brotstangen
es: Colines sin gluten
fr: Gressins sans gluten
hr: Grisini bez glutena
it: Grissini senza glutine
lt: Duonos lazdelės be glitimo
nl: Glutenvrije soepstengels
pl: Grissini bezglutenowe
pt: Gressino sem glúten
ro: Grisină fără gluten
sv: Glutenfria grissini

en: Arepas, corn flat breads
xx: Arepas

en: Pane carasau
it: Pane carasau

en: Flatbreads, Flatbread
da: Fladbrød
de: Fladenbrote, Fladenbrot
es: Panes planos
fi: Ohutleivät, Ohutleipä
fr: Pains plats, pain plat
hr: Somuni
it: Pane basso
lt: Paplotėliai, Paplotėlis
nl: Platte broden, Flat breads
pt: Pães achatados
sv: Flatbröd

en: Frozen flatbreads
da: Frosne fladbrød
pt: Pães achatados congelados
sv: Frysta flatbröd

en: Gluten-free flatbreads
da: Glutenfrie fladbrød
pt: Pães achatados sem glúten
sv: Glutenfria flatbröd

en: Frozen gluten-free flatbreads
da: Frosne glutenfrie fladbrød
pt: Pães achatados congelados sem glúten
sv: Frysta glutenfria flatbröd

en: Khubz ahmar, Red breads
xx: Khubz ahmar
ar: خبز ِاحمر

en: Piadina
xx: Piadina
fr: Piadina
hr: Piadina
it: Piadina

en: Taboon
xx: Taboon
ar: طابون

en: Tandoor breads, Tannour breads
ar: خبز التنور
az: Təndir çörəyi
bn: তন্দুর রুটি
ce: Тандыр Хьокхам
fa: نان تنور
fr: Pain tandoori
gl: Pan do Tandoor
hi: तंदूर की रोटी
hy: Թոնիր նան
jv: Roti tandoor
kk: Тандыр-нан
ko: 탄두르빵
ky: Тандыр-нан
ms: Roti tempayan
nl: Tandooribrood
ru: Тандырный хлеб
sv: Tannourbröd
tk: Tamdyr çöregi
tr: Tandır ekmeği
uk: Тандир-нан
uz: Tandir noni

en: Tunnbröd, Thin breads, Polar breads
xx: Tunnbröd
fr: Pains polaires
ja: トゥンブロード
ko: 툰브뢰드
mk: Тунброд

en: Oat breads, Oat loafs
da: Havrebrød
fi: Kauraleipa
pt: Pães de aveia
sv: Havrebröd

en: Frozen oat breads
da: Frosne havrebrød
pt: Pães de aveia congelados
sv: Frysta havrebröd